src/fst/phonetics/txt2ipa.xfscript
! ======================================== !
!! !!!Hyphenator and text to ipa for Plains Cree
! ======================================== !

!! Defining sets

echo << defining Cns and Vow... >>

define Vow       [ a | á | e | i | o | u | æ | ø | å | ä | ö | 
                   A | Á | E | I | O | U | Æ | Ø | Å | Ä | Ö | 
é | ó | ú | í | à | è | ò | ù | ì | ë | ü | ï | â | ê | ô | û | î | ã | ý |
É | Ó | Ú | Í | À | È | Ò | Ù | Ì | Ë | Ü | Ï | Â | Ê | Ô | Û | Î | Ã | Ý |
ɑ | ɛ | ɔ ] ;

define ShortVow [ a | e | i | o | A | E | I | O ] ;
define LongVow  [ â | ê | î | ô | Â | Ê | Î | Ô ] ;

define CreeVow [ ShortVow | LongVow ] ;


define Cns [ b | c | č | d | đ | ð | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | ŋ | 
             B | C | Č | D | Đ | Ð | F | G | H | J | K | L | M | N | Ŋ | 
             ñ | p | q | r | s | š | t | ŧ | v | w | x | y | z | ž |   
             Ñ | P | Q | R | S | Š | T | Ŧ | V | W | X | Y | Z | Ž |
             ç | ɣ | ł | ŋ | ʁ | w | χ | ɕ | ʲ | ʷ ] ; 

define Sgm [ Cns | Vow ] ;

define Fricative [ H | h | S | s ] ; 

define NonFricative [ Sgm - Fricative ] ;


define Cnss [ Cns - Ss ] ;

define ptk [p|t|k];



!define Dummy [ %^K ] ;


!! The rules

echo << Rules>>



define down [ A -> a, B -> b, C -> c, D -> d, E -> e, F -> f, G -> g, H -> h, 
    I -> i, J -> j, K -> k, L -> l, M -> m, N -> n, O -> o, P -> p, Q -> q, 
    R -> r, S -> s, T -> t, U -> u, V -> v, W -> w, X -> x, Y -> y, Z -> z, 
    Â -> â, Ê -> ê, Î -> î, Ô -> ô ] ;




echo <<Phonology...>> 

define voicing  p -> b , t -> d , k -> g , c -> d ʒ || NonFricative _ Sgm ;

define affricate [ c ->  t s  ] ;

define glide [ y -> j ] ;

!! Long vowels

define aa     [ â -> a%ː ] ;
define ee     [ ê -> e%ː ] ;
define ii     [ î -> i%ː ] ;
define oo     [ ô -> o%ː ] ;



echo <<Combining...>>

read regex [ 
    down
.o. voicing 
.o. affricate
.o. glide
.o. aa
.o. ee
.o. ii
.o. oo
] ;
